Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF422.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2519SV (1) 91 sb/js S.F. 422 Section 1. Section 483A.8, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 10. a. As used in this subsection: 3 (1) âGroup huntingâ means the practice of more than one 4 hunter hunting for deer on the same parcel of land either in 5 cooperation with each other or individually and using only a 6 tag issued to the hunter who has taken the deer. 7 (2) âParty huntingâ means the practice of more than one 8 hunter sharing the total number of tags possessed by the 9 hunters and allowing any hunter to use any tag on any deer 10 taken by a member of the party. Party hunting does not include 11 the practice of group hunting. 12 b. Group hunting is allowed for nonresident and resident 13 hunters. 14 c. Party hunting is allowed for resident hunters subject to 15 rules adopted by the commission. Nonresident hunters shall not 16 engage in party hunting. 17